New York, session 2025-2026, A11182.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 135.60 of the penal law, as 2 amended by section 1 of part NN of chapter 55 of the laws of 2018, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. Cause physical injury to a person or animal; or 5 § 2. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (o) of subdivision 3 of section 575 6 of the executive law, as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 2023, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 (i) Within amounts appropriated for such purpose, the office shall 9 contract with an organization designated by the federal department of 10 health and human services to coordinate statewide improvements within 11 local communities, social services systems, and programming regarding 12 the prevention and intervention of domestic violence in New York state 13 to mutually develop a training program as described in this paragraph. 14 The office and such organization shall be responsible for providing such 15 training to psychiatrists, psychologists and social workers who are 16 licensed in the state of New York, so that such individuals may conduct 17 court ordered forensic evaluations, involving child custody and visita- 18 tion pursuant to paragraph (a-3) of subdivision one of section two 19 hundred forty of the domestic relations law; for consulting with domes- 20 tic violence service providers and representative organizations in the 21 field of domestic violence when such training is provided in their 22 communities; and for reviewing and updating training topics at least 23 once every two years. Such training shall include, but not be limited 24 to, a review of: relevant statutes; case law and psychological defi- 25 nitions of domestic violence; coercive control, including through the 26 use of threats or harm to animals, and child abuse; the dynamics and 27 effects of domestic violence and child abuse, including but not limited 28 to, emotional, financial, physical, technological and sexual abuse; the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15135-01-6 A. 11182 2 1 barriers and fears associated with reporting domestic violence and child 2 abuse and why victims may not have documented evidence of abuse; tactics 3 commonly used by one party to induce fear in another party or child, 4 including verbal, emotional, psychological, and/or economic abuse, 5 isolating techniques, coercive control, including through the use of 6 threats or harm to animals, and monitoring of a partner's location and 7 activities; litigation abuse and demands for custody or joint custody in 8 order to pressure the partner to return or punish the partner for leav- 9 ing; trauma, particularly as it relates to sexual abuse and the risks 10 posed to children and the long-term dangers and impacts imposed by the 11 presence of adverse childhood experiences; the increased risk of esca- 12 lating violence that occurs during child custody proceedings; and the 13 danger of basing child custody decisions on claims that a child's defi- 14 cient or negative relationship with a parent is caused by the other 15 parent. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.